District of Columbia statutes.
31-5309

Operations of nonprofit institutions.

A society may create, maintain, and operate, or may establish organizations to operate, not-for-profit institutions to further the purposes permitted by § 31-5302(a)(2). Such institutions may furnish services free of charge or at a reasonable charge. Any real or personal property owned, held, or leased by the society for this purpose shall be reported in every annual statement.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1210, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1239.